North Carolina, session 2025, HB995.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the nonrecurring sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated as a directed grant to Triad Cultural Arts,
Inc., a nonprofit corporation, to be used for the development of the Shotgun House Legacy Site
project in the City of Winston-Salem.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H995-v-1*